Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2214.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Compensation" means a payment of any moneys, a thing of
value or financial benefit conferred on or received by any person in return
for services rendered or to be rendered.
(2) "Veterans benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation or
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed
an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity,
function, status or entitlement that veterans, their dependents, their
survivors or any other person who is eligible under the laws and
regulations administered by the United States department of veterans
affairs or the Kansas office of veterans services.
(3) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, trust, partnership,
incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other legal entity.
(b) (1) No person may receive compensation for:
(A) Referring any veteran to another person for advice or assistance
in such veteran's benefits matter; or
(B) any services rendered in connection with any claim filed within
the one-year presumptive period of active-duty release, unless the veteran
acknowledges by signing a waiver that such veteran's active-duty release is
within the one-year period but is choosing to deny the free services
available to such veteran.
(2) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting
or consulting with any veterans benefits matter shall, before rendering any
services, memorialize the specific terms that specify the amount to be paid
will be determined in a written agreement signed by both parties.
Compensation shall be contingent upon an increase in the awarded
benefits and, if successful, such compensation shall not exceed five times
the amount of the monthly increase in benefits awarded based on the
claim. No initial or nonrefundable fee may be charged by a person
advising, assisting or consulting an individual on a veterans benefits

HB 2214 2
matter.
(3) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting
or consulting in connection with any veterans benefits matter shall, before
rendering any services, memorialize the specific terms under which the
amount to be paid will be determined in a written agreement signed by
both parties. Compensation shall be contingent upon an increase in
benefits awarded and, if successful, such compensation shall not exceed
five times the amount of the monthly increase in benefits awarded based
on the claim. No initial or nonrefundable fee may be charged by a person
advising, assisting or consulting an individual on a veterans benefits
matter.
(4) No person shall guarantee, either directly or by implication, a
successful outcome or that any person is certain to receive specific
veterans benefits or a specific level, percentage or amount of veterans
benefits.
(5) (A) Any person advising, assisting or consulting on veterans
benefits matters for compensation shall provide the following disclosure at
the outset of the business relationship: "This business is not sponsored by
or affiliated with the United States department of veterans affairs or the
Kansas office of veterans services, or any other federally chartered
veterans service organization. Other organizations, including, but not
limited to, the Kansas office of veterans services, a local veterans service
organization and other federally chartered veterans service organizations
may be able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products or
services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of
these organizations. You may qualify for other veterans benefits beyond
the benefits for which you are receiving services here."
(B) The written disclosure shall appear in at least 12-point font
in an easily identifiable place in the person's agreement with the individual
seeking services. The person shall sign the document in which the written
disclosure appears to represent understanding of these provisions. The
person offering services shall retain a copy of the written disclosure while
providing veterans benefits services for compensation and for at least one
year after the date on which the service relations terminate.
(6) Businesses advising, assisting or consulting on veterans' benefits
matters for a fee shall:
(A) Not utilize international call centers or data centers for processing
veterans' personal information;
(B) not use a veteran's personal login, username or password
information to access such veteran's medical, financial or government
benefits information; and
(C) ensure that any person who has access to veterans' medical or
financial information undergoes a criminal history record check prior to

HB 2214 3
having access to that information. The criminal history record check shall
be conducted by a reputable source and include identity verification and a
criminal records check.
(c) (1) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair, false,
misleading or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or
commerce under K.S.A. 50-623 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(2) Civil penalties shall be in an amount ordered by the district court
in an action brought by the attorney general.
(3) Each day that a violation continues is a separate violation.
(4) Nothing in this section is to be construed as applying to or
limiting or expanding the
requirements imposed on agents, attorneys or other representatives
accredited by the United States department of veterans affairs and
regulated by such agency.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.